Washington statutes.
RCW 27.12.140

Intercounty rural library districts—Name may be adopted.

The board of trustees of an intercounty rural library district may adopt a name by which the district shall be known and under which it shall transact all of its business.

[ 1947 c 75 s 6; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 8246-6.]